Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-106
Interest; warrants or orders.

All warrants or orders issued by the proper authorities of any county, city, township, school district, other municipal subdivision less than a county, or sanitary district, whose area is located partly within a municipality, shall draw interest from and after the date of presentation for payment at such rate as is fixed by the issuing authority and endorsed on the warrant. All warrants issued by the state shall draw interest at the rate of four percent per annum from the date the same are presented for payment.

Laws 1879, § 10, p. 115;

Laws 1895, c. 43, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1895, c. 44, § 1, p. 186;

Laws 1899, c. 48, § 1, p. 260;

Laws 1903, c. 54, § 1, p. 345;

R.S.1913, § 3355;

Laws 1919, c. 108, § 1, p. 264;

C.S.1922, § 2843;

Laws 1929, c. 125, § 1, p. 472;

C.S.1929, § 45-110;

R.S.1943, § 45-106;

Laws 1945, c. 110, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1947, c. 171, § 2, p. 519;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 109, p. 340.

For other provisions as to interest on warrants:

Counties, see section 23-1602.

Drainage districts, see section 31-416.